algorithms/persian.sbl
/*
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Persian Stemmer (HPS-like)
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Based on the paper:
*   "HPS: A Hierarchical Persian Stemming Method"
*   Ayshe Rashidi, Mina Zolfy Lighvan (2014)
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Differences from original HPS:
* 1) No POS-tagger stage:
*      - HPS uses a POS tagger to route tokens to Noun, Adjective, or Verb
*        suffix rules directly.
*      - Here we fall back to the fixed order: Noun → Adjective → Verb
*        when POS is unknown.
*      Reason: Implementation is tagger-agnostic and lightweight.
* 2) Lexical "-AN" guard:
*      - Added `Protect_Lexical_AN` to avoid stripping true lexical endings
*        like "...stan", "...ran", and known stems (Iran, Tehran, Ensan).
*      Reason: reduces over-stemming where HPS relied on explicit hash lists.
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* PIPELINE (HPS-like, POS-tagger free):
*   1) Normalize characters : unify Arabic variants; delete ZWNJ/ZWJ/spaces
*   2) Strip start-anchored prefixes (repeatable)
*   3) Iteratively peel one suffix layer per pass, in fixed order:
*        Noun → Adjective → Verb
*      If a noun rule fires, the pass is frozen (no adj/verb in that pass).
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Implemented by: https://saeiddrv.com
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
*/

stringescapes { }

// ============================================================================
//  Alphabet & special symbols
// ============================================================================
stringdef alef       '{U+0627}'
stringdef aa         '{U+0622}'
stringdef be         '{U+0628}'
stringdef pe         '{U+067E}'
stringdef te         '{U+062A}'
stringdef se         '{U+062B}'
stringdef jim        '{U+062C}'
stringdef che        '{U+0686}'
stringdef heh_jimi   '{U+062D}'
stringdef khe        '{U+062E}'
stringdef dal        '{U+062F}'
stringdef zal        '{U+0630}'
stringdef re         '{U+0631}'
stringdef ze         '{U+0632}'
stringdef zhe        '{U+0698}'
stringdef sin        '{U+0633}'
stringdef shin       '{U+0634}'
stringdef sad        '{U+0635}'
stringdef zad        '{U+0636}'
stringdef ta         '{U+0637}'
stringdef za         '{U+0638}'
stringdef ain        '{U+0639}'
stringdef ghain      '{U+063A}'
stringdef fe         '{U+0641}'
stringdef ghaf       '{U+0642}'
stringdef kaf        '{U+06A9}'
stringdef gaf        '{U+06AF}'
stringdef lam        '{U+0644}'
stringdef mim        '{U+0645}'
stringdef nun        '{U+0646}'
stringdef vav        '{U+0648}'
stringdef heh        '{U+0647}'
stringdef ye         '{U+06CC}'

stringdef space             '{U+0020}'
stringdef zero_width_joiner '{U+200D}'
stringdef half_space        '{U+200C}' // zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ)
// Note: U+200C (ZERO WIDTH NON-JOINER) is commonly referred to as "nim-faseleh" ("half-space") in Persian.
// Although this name is not standard in English Unicode terminology, it reflects its widespread use
// in Persian as a morpheme separator within words. This character is here to normalize

// Arabic variants to normalize → Persian forms
stringdef ar_kaf                   '{U+0643}'
stringdef ar_ye                    '{U+064A}'
stringdef ar_ye_with_hamza_above   '{U+0626}'
stringdef ar_heh                   '{U+06C1}'
stringdef ar_he_marbuta            '{U+0629}'
stringdef ar_alef_with_hamza_above '{U+0623}'
stringdef ar_alef_with_hamza_below '{U+0625}'
stringdef ar_vav_with_hamza_above  '{U+0624}'

// ============================================================================
//  Declarations (routines, flags, and marks)
// ============================================================================
routines (
  Normalize_Characters  // Forward: Unicode/script normalization
  Strip_Prefix_At_Start // Forward: anchored prefix peeling (one per call)
  Protect_Lexical_AN    // Probe: flag lexical -AN endings (per pass)

  // Noun tier (HPS categories)
  AN_LexHash N_Hash V_Hash
  Noun_Possessive  Noun_Plural  Noun_Other  Stem_Noun
  Adjective_Superlative_Comparative  Adjective_Derivational
  Adjective_Relative Stem_Adjective
  Participle_Clitic_Tails
  Verb_Person_Endings  Verb_Tense_Mood_Markers  Stem_Verb
)

externals ( stem )

// Loop/guard flags and marks:
//  - 'changed'           : set true whenever a rule modifies the buffer in this pass.
//  - 'protect_lex_an'    : true when final -AN is lexical (not plural) in this pass.
//  - 'freeze_pass'       : true when a noun rule requests skipping adj/verb tiers
//                          in the current pass (e.g., after -gah / -dan stripping).
//  - 'saw_present_prefix': true when a present-tense prefix (mi-/nemi-) is stripped;
//                          used to enable verb person-ending rules in this pass.
//  - 'saw_inf_or_part'   : true when an infinitive (-n/an) or participle (-h) is stripped;
//                          also enables verb person-ending rules in this pass.
//  - 'start_mark'        : index of token start for anchored prefix matching.
//  - 'temp_mark'         : temporary cursor save/restore during probes or rewrites.
booleans ( changed protect_lex_an freeze_pass saw_present_prefix saw_inf_or_part )
integers ( start_mark temp_mark )

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 1 — NORMALIZATION (forward)
//  - Unify Arabic forms to Persian letters for stable downstream matching.
//  - Delete ZWNJ (U+200C), ZWJ (U+200D), and ASCII spaces so the token is solid.
// ============================================================================
define Normalize_Characters as (
  repeat (
    [substring] among (
      '{ar_kaf}'                                                 (<- '{kaf}')
      '{ar_ye}' '{ar_ye_with_hamza_above}'                       (<- '{ye}')
      '{ar_heh}' '{ar_he_marbuta}'                               (<- '{heh}')
      '{ar_alef_with_hamza_above}' '{ar_alef_with_hamza_below}'  (<- '{alef}')
      '{ar_vav_with_hamza_above}'                                (<- '{vav}')
      '{half_space}'                                             ( delete )
      '{zero_width_joiner}'                                      ( delete )
      '{space}'                                                  ( delete )
      ''                                                         ( next )
    )
  )
)

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 2 — PREFIX STRIPPING (forward, anchored)
//  - HPS: remove known prefixes before suffix processing.
//  - Sets `saw_present_prefix` when matching {mi}/{nemi} to enable person endings later.
// ============================================================================
define Strip_Prefix_At_Start as (
  setmark temp_mark
  tomark start_mark
  [substring] among (
    // with optional space variants to handle ZWNJ → space
    '{nun}{mim}{ye}'         ($(len > 4) delete set changed set saw_present_prefix) // NEMI
    '{mim}{ye}'              ($(len > 3) delete set changed set saw_present_prefix) // MI
    '{nun}{alef}'            ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // NA
    '{be}{ye}'               ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // BI
  )
  tomark temp_mark
)

// ============================================================================
//  PROBE — PROTECT LEXICAL "-AN" (not plural)
//  - HPS strips -AN as a plural; however, many stems end in orthographic "AN":
//      ...stan / ...san / ...ran (place names/lexical stems), and frequent
//      stems such as Iran/Tehran/Ensan/Ostan.
//  - We set 'protect_lex_an' per pass if a trailing pattern indicates lexical AN.
//  - This is a probe only: it NEVER edits the buffer; it only sets a flag.
//  - We always restore the cursor with 'temp_mark' after probing.
// ============================================================================

define Protect_Lexical_AN as (
  unset protect_lex_an
  setmark temp_mark
  backwards (
    do AN_LexHash or
    [substring] among (
      '{sin}{te}{alef}{nun}'  ( set protect_lex_an )  // …stan
      '{sin}{alef}{nun}'      ( set protect_lex_an )  // …san
      '{re}{alef}{nun}'       ( set protect_lex_an )  // …ran
    )
  )
  tomark temp_mark
)

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 3 — SUFFIX STRIPPING (backward)
//  - All routines in backward mode start matching from the end of the token.
//  - IMPORTANT: no successful "no-op" arms; every success must modify the text.
//    This ensures 'repeat' loops terminate.
//  - Length guards $(len > N) reduce over-stemming risk on short words.
// ============================================================================
backwardmode (

  // --- Lexical "-AN" hash list (exact matches).
  //     Small curated set of stems ending in orthographic -AN that are not plural.
  //     Used by `Protect_Lexical_AN` to prevent stripping on place names / lexical nouns.
  define AN_LexHash as (
    [substring] among (
      '{aa}{lam}{mim}{alef}{nun}'         ( set protect_lex_an ) // alman
      '{aa}{sin}{alef}{nun}'              ( set protect_lex_an ) // asan
      '{alef}{ye}{mim}{alef}{nun}'        ( set protect_lex_an ) // eiman
      '{dal}{re}{mim}{alef}{nun}'         ( set protect_lex_an ) // darman
      '{pe}{ye}{mim}{alef}{nun}'          ( set protect_lex_an ) // payman
      '{re}{mim}{alef}{nun}'              ( set protect_lex_an ) // roman
      '{alef}{ye}{re}{alef}{nun}'         ( set protect_lex_an ) // iran
      '{te}{heh}{re}{alef}{nun}'          ( set protect_lex_an ) // tehran
      '{alef}{nun}{sin}{alef}{nun}'       ( set protect_lex_an ) // ensan
    )
  )

  // --- Noun irregular rewrites (small hash table).
  //     Only include entries that actually change the buffer.
  define N_Hash as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{khe}{be}{alef}{re}'      (<- '{khe}{be}{re}' set changed)
      '{khe}{vav}{alef}{sin}'          (<- '{khe}{alef}{sin}{heh}' set changed)
      '{alef}{sin}{alef}{te}{ye}{dal}' (<- '{alef}{sin}{te}{alef}{dal}' set changed)
    )
  )

  // --- Verb irregular rewrites (compact).
  define V_Hash as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{sin}{te}' (<- '{heh}{sin}{te}' set changed)
    )
  )

  // --- Noun possessive suffixes (long + short clitics)
  define Noun_Possessive as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{mim}'      ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -AM
      '{alef}{te}'       ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -AT
      '{alef}{shin}'     ($(len > 4) delete set changed) // -ASH
      '{mim}{alef}{nun}' ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -MAN
      '{te}{alef}{nun}'  ($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -TAN
      '{shin}{alef}{nun}'($(len > 5) delete set changed) // -SHAN

      // short clitics
      '{mim}'             ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // -M
      '{te}'              ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // -T
      '{shin}'            ($(len > 3) delete set changed) // -SH
    )
  )
